Mississippi, session 20251E, SB2041.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  The following sum, or so much thereof as may be necessary, is hereby appropriated out of any money in the State General Fund not otherwise appropriated, for the purpose of paying service charges to banks for acting as agents of the State of Mississippi in paying bonds and interest on the full faith and credit bonds of the state, this appropriation to be available from the effective date of this act until such bonds shall be paid or until June 30, 2026, whichever shall first occur; and for the purpose of paying maturing bonds and interest on the full faith and credit bonds of the State of Mississippi falling due during Fiscal Year 2026........... $   422,365,135.00. SECTION 2.  The following sum, or so much thereof as may be necessary, is hereby appropriated out of any money in the State Treasury which is comprised of special source funds and interest earnings on bond proceeds for the purpose of paying maturing bonds and interest on the full faith and credit bonds of the State of Mississippi falling due during Fiscal Year 2026........................................ ............................................ $ 17,750,250.00. SECTION 3.  The following sum, or so much thereof as may be necessary, is hereby authorized to expend any money in the State Treasury which is comprised of special source funds and interest earnings on bond proceeds for the purpose of paying maturing bonds and interest on the revenue bonds of the State of Mississippi falling due during Fiscal Year 2026......................................... $ 41,753,750.00. SECTION 4.  The several items covering maturing bonds and interest as evidenced by coupons on the bonds shall be paid out of the State Treasury as and when provided by law and according to the schedule of interest payments in the several issues of full faith and credit bonds or revenue bonds on which principal and interest is due and payable between the dates of July 1, 2025, and June 30, 2026. SECTION 5.  It is the intention of the Legislature that the State Treasurer is hereby authorized to accept, budget and expend any excess funds which become available from interest earnings on bond proceeds or from loan repayments received pursuant to bond documents.  Such funds shall be escalated in accordance with the rules and regulations of the Department of Finance and Administration in a manner consistent with the escalation of federal funds. SECTION 6.  Of the funds appropriated in Section 1 of this act hereof, the sum of Five Hundred Thousand Dollars ($500,000.00), or so much thereof as may be necessary, is herein appropriated for paying bank service charges.  Itemized statements of banks making service charges shall be attached to requisitions of the State Treasurer. SECTION 7.  The money herein appropriated shall be paid by the State Treasurer out of any money in the State Treasury to the credit of the proper fund or funds as set forth in this act, upon warrants issued by the State Fiscal Officer; and the State Fiscal Officer shall issue his warrants upon requisitions signed by the proper person, officer or officers in the manner provided by law. SECTION 8.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2025.